Florida, session 2026, SB918.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 26 27 Section 1.âSubsection (3) of section 985.455, Florida 28 Statutes, is amended to read: 29 985.455âOther dispositional issues.â 30 (3)âFor any commitment of a delinquent child to the 31 department, a court shall determine the minimum period of time 32 for the delinquent child to remain in a commitment program. A 33 delinquent child committed to the department must remain in the 34 commitment program until he or she has completed it. must be for 35 an indeterminate period of time, which may include periods of 36 temporary release; However, the period of time may not exceed 37 the maximum term of imprisonment that an adult may serve for the 38 same offense. The child must have an duration of the childâs 39 placement in a commitment program of any restrictiveness level 40 shall be based on objective performance-based treatment plan 41 while in the commitment of the program planning. The childâs 42 treatment plan progress and adjustment-related issues shall be 43 reported to the court quarterly, unless the court requests 44 monthly reports. If the child is under the jurisdiction of a 45 dependency court, the court may receive and consider any 46 information provided by the Statewide Guardian ad Litem Office 47 or the childâs attorney ad litem, if one is appointed. The 48 childâs length of stay in a commitment program may be extended 49 if the child fails to comply with or participate in treatment 50 activities. The childâs length of stay in the program shall not 51 be extended for purposes of sanction or punishment. Any 52 temporary release from such program must be approved by the 53 court. Any child so committed may be discharged from 54 institutional confinement or a program upon the direction of the 55 department with the concurrence of the court. The childâs 56 treatment plan progress and adjustment-related issues must be 57 communicated to the court at the time the department requests 58 the court to consider releasing the child from the commitment 59 program. The department shall give the court that committed the 60 child to the department reasonable notice, in writing, of its 61 desire to discharge the child from a commitment facility. The 62 court that committed the child may thereafter accept or reject 63 the request. If the court does not respond within 10 days after 64 receipt of the notice, the request of the department shall be 65 deemed granted. This section does not limit the departmentâs 66 authority to revoke a childâs temporary release status and 67 return the child to a commitment facility for any violation of 68 the terms and conditions of the temporary release. 69 Section 2.âSection 985.465, Florida Statutes, is amended to 70 read: 71 985.465âMaximum-risk residential facilities.âA maximum-risk 72 residential facility is a physically secure residential 73 commitment program with a designated length of stay from 18 74 months to 36 months, primarily serving children 10 13 years of 75 age to 19 years of age or until the jurisdiction of the court 76 expires. Each child committed to this level must meet one of the 77 following criteria: 78 (1)âThe child is at least 10 years of age at the time of 79 the disposition for the current offense and has been adjudicated 80 on the current offense for murder or manslaughter. 81 (2)âThe child is at least 13 years of age at the time of 82 the disposition for the current offense and has been adjudicated 83 on the current offense for: 84 (a)âArson; 85 (b)âSexual battery; 86 (c)âRobbery; 87 (d)âKidnapping; 88 (e)âAggravated child abuse; 89 (f)âAggravated assault; 90 (g)âAggravated stalking; 91 (h)âMurder; 92 (i)âManslaughter; 93 (j)âUnlawful throwing, placing, or discharging of a 94 destructive device or bomb; 95 (i)(k)âArmed burglary; 96 (j)(l)âAggravated battery; 97 (k)(m)âCarjacking; 98 (l)(n)âHome-invasion robbery; 99 (m)(o)âBurglary with an assault or battery; 100 (n)(p)âAny lewd or lascivious offense committed upon or in 101 the presence of a person less than 16 years of age; or 102 (o)(q)âCarrying, displaying, using, threatening to use, or 103 attempting to use a weapon or firearm during the commission of a 104 felony. 105 (3)(2)âThe child is at least 13 years of age at the time of 106 the disposition, the current offense is a felony, and the child 107 has previously been committed three or more times to a 108 delinquency commitment program. 109 (4)(3)âThe child is at least 13 years of age and is 110 currently committed for a felony offense and transferred from a 111 moderate-risk or high-risk residential commitment placement. 112 (5)(4)âThe child is at least 13 years of age at the time of 113 the disposition for the current offense, the child is eligible 114 for prosecution as an adult for the current offense, and the 115 current offense is ranked at level 7 or higher on the Criminal 116 Punishment Code offense severity ranking chart pursuant to s. 117 921.0022. 118 Section 3.âFor the purpose of incorporating the amendment 119 made by this act to section 985.455, Florida Statutes, in a 120 reference thereto, paragraph (b) of subsection (4) of section 121 985.35, Florida Statutes, is reenacted to read: 122 985.35âAdjudicatory hearings; withheld adjudications; 123 orders of adjudication.â 124 (4)âIf the court finds that the child named in the petition 125 has committed a delinquent act or violation of law, it may, in 126 its discretion, enter an order stating the facts upon which its 127 finding is based but withholding adjudication of delinquency. 128 (b)âIf the child is attending public school and the court 129 finds that the victim or a sibling of the victim in the case was 130 assigned to attend or is eligible to attend the same school as 131 the child, the court order shall include a finding pursuant to 132 the proceedings described in s. 985.455, regardless of whether 133 adjudication is withheld. 134 Section 4.âFor the purpose of incorporating the amendment 135 made by this act to section 985.455, Florida Statutes, in a 136 reference thereto, paragraph (b) of subsection (4) of section 137 985.565, Florida Statutes, is reenacted to read: 138 985.565âSentencing powers; procedures; alternatives for 139 juveniles prosecuted as adults.â 140 (4)âSENTENCING ALTERNATIVES.â 141 (b)âJuvenile sanctions.âFor juveniles transferred to adult 142 court but who do not qualify for such transfer under s. 143 985.556(3), the court may impose juvenile sanctions under this 144 paragraph. If juvenile sentences are imposed, the court shall, 145 under this paragraph, adjudge the child to have committed a 146 delinquent act. Adjudication of delinquency may not be deemed a 147 conviction, nor shall it operate to impose any of the civil 148 disabilities ordinarily resulting from a conviction. The court 149 shall impose an adult sanction or a juvenile sanction and may 150 not sentence the child to a combination of adult and juvenile 151 punishments. An adult sanction or a juvenile sanction may 152 include enforcement of an order of restitution or probation 153 previously ordered in any juvenile proceeding. However, if the 154 court imposes a juvenile sanction and the department determines 155 that the sanction is unsuitable for the child, the department 156 shall return custody of the child to the sentencing court for 157 further proceedings, including the imposition of adult 158 sanctions. Upon adjudicating a child delinquent under subsection 159 (1), the court may: 160 1.âPlace the child in a probation program under the 161 supervision of the department for an indeterminate period of 162 time until the child reaches the age of 19 years or sooner if 163 discharged by order of the court. 164 2.âCommit the child to the department for treatment in an 165 appropriate program for children for an indeterminate period of 166 time until the child is 21 or sooner if discharged by the 167 department. The department shall notify the court of its intent 168 to discharge no later than 14 days before discharge. Failure of 169 the court to timely respond to the departmentâs notice shall be 170 considered approval for discharge. 171 3.âOrder disposition under ss. 985.435, 985.437, 985.439, 172 985.441, 985.45, and 985.455 as an alternative to youthful 173 offender or adult sentencing if the court determines not to 174 impose youthful offender or adult sanctions. 175 176 It is the intent of the Legislature that the criteria and 177 guidelines in this subsection are mandatory and that a 178 determination of disposition under this subsection is subject to 179 the right of the child to appellate review under s. 985.534. 180 Section 5.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.